District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

19-303

When surviving spouse entitled to one-third.

Repealed.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 698, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 805(c), 48 DCR 2087

History

1981 Ed., § 19-303.
1973 Ed., § 19-303.

Prior Codifications